Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The amounts authorized, as provided by ORS 286A.035, for  issuance of gen-
eral obligation bonds of the state during the 2021-2023 biennium are as follows:
GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS
General Fund Obligations
(1) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-G):
(a) Eastern Oregon University,
Inlow Hall Renovation,
Phase II ................................ $ 600,000
(b) Oregon State University:
(A) Cascades Student
Success Center ...................... $ 5,105,000
(B) Cordley Hall Renovation,
Phase II ................................ $ 25,375,000
(c) Portland State University,
Gateway Center Reuse and
Extension .............................. $ 5,105,000
(d) University of Oregon,
Heritage Building Renovation $ 5,960,000
(e) Western Oregon University,
Student Success Center ........ $ 695,000
(f) Blue Mountain Community
College, Facility for
Agricultural Resource
Management.......................... $ 6,615,000
(g) Central Oregon Community
College, Classroom Building
Redmond Campus.................. $ 8,125,000
(h) Chemeketa Community
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 1
College, Building 7 Remodel.. $ 8,125,000
(i) Clatsop Community College,
Maritime Science Building .... $ 8,120,000
(j) Klamath Community College,
Childcare Resource Learning
Center ................................... $ 1,540,000
(k) Linn-Benton Community
College, Agricultural Center . $ 8,125,000
(L) Mt. Hood Community College,
Accessibility Upgrades,
Dental Hygiene Lab and
Deferred Maintenance........... $ 8,125,000
(m) Oregon Coast Community
College, Workforce Education
and Resiliency Center ........... $ 8,125,000
(n) Rogue Community College,
Transportation Technology
Center ................................... $ 7,120,000
(o) Tillamook Bay Community
College, Classroom and
Office Building and
Renovations........................... $ 8,125,000
(p) Treasure Valley Community
College, Nursing-Allied
Health Professions Center .... $ 5,015,000
(2) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ............... $ 10,300,000 
(3) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-M) ....... $ 111,300,000
(4) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-N) ........ $ 50,750,000
(5) Department of Education
(Art. XI-P) ............................ $ 126,090,000
(6) Oregon Department of
Administrative
Services (Art. XI-Q):
(a) Department of Revenue,
Electronic Valuation
Information System .............. $ 4,245,000
(b) Oregon Military Department:
(A) Ashland Armory Service
Life Extension ....................... $ 5,480,000
(B) Corvallis Armory Service
Life Extension ....................... $ 4,375,000
(C) Resiliency Grant Fund
established under
ORS 401.552........................... $ 10,210,000
(D) Washington County
Readiness Center .................. $ 5,410,000
(c) Oregon State Police:
(A) Central Point Office
Expansion.............................. $ 34,435,000
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 2
(B) Springfield Forensic Lab and
Medical Examiner’s Office .... $ 62,710,000
(C) Springfield Patrol Area
Command Office.................... $ 14,490,000
(d) Department of Corrections:
(A) Capital Improvement and
Renewal................................. $ 70,745,000
(B) Electronic Health Records .... $ 13,635,000
(C) Off-Net Telephone
Infrastructure ....................... $ 3,825,000
(e) Oregon Youth Authority:
(A) Camp Riverbend Dorm
Renovation............................ $ 6,975,000
(B) Capital Improvements........... $ 11,060,000
(C) Control Room Renovations ... $ 1,300,000
(D) JJIS IT System
Modernization....................... $ 7,870,000
(E) MacLaren Infirmary and
Pharmacy Renovation ........... $ 1,720,000
(F) MacLaren West Cottages
Renovations........................... $ 20,795,000
(G) Oak Creek Medical and
Dental Clinic Renovations..... $ 710,000
(H) Rogue Valley Facility
Improvements ....................... $ 7,110,000
(I) Tillamook Dorm Renovation . $ 10,495,000
(J) Tillamook Medical and
Dental Renovations ............... $ 690,000
(f) Oregon Health Authority:
(A) OSH Salem Well Water
Treatment Facility ................ $ 4,555,000
(B) OSH Salem/Junction City
Automated Dispensing
Cabinets ................................ $ 3,555,000
(g) Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
(A) Public Universities Capital
Improvement and Renewal ... $ 80,810,000
(B) Eastern Oregon University,
Inlow Hall Renovation,
Phase II ................................ $ 17,920,000
(C) Oregon Institute of
Technology, OMIC R&D Center
for Additive Manufacturing
Innovation, Phase II ............. $  5,105,000
(D) Oregon State University:
(i) Cascades Student Success
Center ................................... $ 8,930,000
(ii) Cordley Hall Renovation,
Phase II ................................ $ 61,690,000
(E) Portland State University,
Gateway Center Reuse and
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 3
Extension .............................. $ 45,585,000
(F) University of Oregon,
Heritage Building Renovation $ 53,285,000
(G) Western Oregon University,
Student Success Center ........ $ 20,920,000
(H) FAMIS System Replacement $ 5,105,000
(h) Department of Education:
(A) Oregon School for the Deaf
ADA Restrooms .................... $ 1,065,000
(B) Oregon School for the Deaf
Fire Alarm System
Replacement.......................... $ 3,145,000
(C) Oregon School for the Deaf
Windows Upgrade ................. $ 1,425,000
(i) State Forestry Department:
(A) Capital Improvements........... $ 2,464,209
(B) Toledo Facility Replacement
Phase II ................................ $ 1,136,227
(j) State Parks and Recreation
Department, Capital
Improvement and Renewal ... $ 50,750,000
(k) Oregon Department of
Fish and Wildlife,
Capital Improvement
and Renewal.......................... $ 5,105,000
(L) Housing and Community
Services Department,
Local Innovation and Fast
Track (LIFT) Housing and
Permanent Supportive
Housing................................. $ 413,490,000
(m) Judicial Department:
(A) Benton County Courthouse ... $ 20,730,000
(B) Clackamas County
Courthouse............................ $ 95,400,000
(C) Crook County Courthouse..... $ 11,885,000
(D) Linn County Courthouse ....... $ 16,110,000
(E) Supreme Court Building
Renovation............................ $ 21,950,000
(n) Legislative Administration
Committee, Document
Publishing and Management
System .................................. $  4,310,000
Dedicated Fund Obligations
(7) Department of Veterans’
Affairs (Art. XI-A) ................ $ 180,000,000
(8) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ............... $ 10,000,000
(9) Housing and Community
Services Department
(Art. XI-I(2)) ......................... $ 50,000,000
(10) Higher Education Coordinating
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 4
Commission (Art. XI-F(1)):
(a) Oregon Institute of
Technology, New Residence
Hall Facility .......................... $ 55,650,000
(b) Oregon State University,
Reser Stadium West
Grandstands.......................... $ 40,555,000
(c) Portland State University,
Gateway Center Reuse
and Extension ...................... $ 18,300,000
(11) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services
(Art. XI-Q):
(a) Executive Building Interior
and Seismic Renovation ........ $ 45,620,000
(b) Justice Building Exterior
Renovations........................... $ 3,555,000
(c) North Valley Complex
Infrastructure Upgrades/
Tenant Improvements ........... $ 60,820,000
(d) Portland State Office
Building Improvements......... $ 8,730,000
(e) Revenue Building Electrical
System Upgrades .................. $ 7,120,000
(f) Yellow Parking Lot Paving ... $ 4,055,000
(g) State Forestry Department:
(A) Capital Improvements........... $ 2,420,791
(B) Toledo Facility Replacement,
Phase II ................................ $ 1,578,773
(h) Oregon Liquor Control
Commission:
(A) Liquor Warehouse Conveyor
System .................................. $ 10,175,000
(B) Liquor Warehouse Land
and Building.......................... $ 53,170,000
(C) Liquor Warehouse
Management IT System ........ $ 27,390,000
Total General Obligation
Bonds ....................................  $ 2,252,290,200
SECTION 2. The amounts authorized, as provided  by ORS 286A.035, for issuance of re-
venue bonds of the state during the 2021-2023 biennium are as follows:
REVENUE BONDS
Direct Revenue Bonds
Housing and Community
Services Department ............. $ 500,000,000
Department of
Transportation...................... $ 880,000,000
Oregon Business Development
Department ........................... $ 30,000,000 
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services,
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 5
Lottery Revenue Bonds ........ $ 492,440,000
Total Direct Revenue
Bonds ....................................  $ 1,902,440,000
Pass-Through Revenue Bonds
Oregon Business Development
Department, Industrial
Development Bonds............... $ 600,000,000
Oregon Business Development
Department, Beginning and
Expanding Farmer Loan
Program ................................ $ 2,500,000
Oregon Facilities Authority .. $ 1,000,000,000
Housing and Community
Services Department.............  $ 1,300,000,000
Total Pass-Through Revenue
Bonds ....................................  $ 2,902,500,000
Total Revenue Bonds ............ $ 4,804,940,000
SECTION 3. The amount authorized, as  provided by ORS 286A.035, for issuance of cer-
tificates of participation and other financing agreements  of the state during the 2021-2023
biennium for the Oregon Department of Administrative Services is $100,000,000.
SECTION 4. (1) For calendar year 2022, the amount of $442,862,385  is allocated for private
activity bonds, as provided in ORS 286A.615, as follows:
(a) Oregon Business Development
Department, Industrial
Development Bonds............... $ 40,000,000
(b) Oregon Business Development
Department, Beginning and
Expanding Farmer Loan
Program ................................ $ 1,000,000
(c) Housing and Community
Services Department ............. $ 250,000,000
(d) Private Activity Bond
Committee............................. $ 151,862,385
(2) For calendar  year 2023, the amount of $442,862,385 is allocated for private activity
bonds, as provided in ORS 286A.615, as follows:
(a) Oregon Business Development
Department, Industrial
Development Bonds............... $ 40,000,000
(b) Oregon Business Development
Department, Beginning and
Expanding Farmer Loan
Program ................................ $ 1,000,000
(c) Housing and Community
Services Department ............. $ 250,000,000
(d) Private Activity Bond
Committee............................. $ 151,862,385
(3) If an increase in this state’s population, a sufficient increase in the Consumer Price
Index or a change in federal law allows the private activity bond limit  as set by the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,  to exceed $442,862,385 during the 2022 calendar year or
$442,862,385 during the 2023 calendar year, the increase is allocated to the  Private Activity
Bond Committee.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 6
SECTION 5. (1) For purposes of Article XI-F(1), section 1, of  the Oregon Constitution,
the Legislative Assembly determines that the projects  authorized to be financed pursuant to
section 1 (10) of this 2021 Act with bonds issued under Article XI-F(1) of the Oregon  Consti-
tution will benefit higher education institutions or activities.
(2) For purposes of Article  XI-G, section 1, of the Oregon Constitution, the Legislative
Assembly determines that the projects authorized  to be financed pursuant to section 1 (1)
of this 2021 Act  with bonds issued under Article XI-G of the Oregon Constitution will benefit
higher education institutions or activities or community colleges authorized by law to receive
state aid.
SECTION 6.
Bonds authorized under section 1 (1) of this  2021 Act may not be issued until
the constructing authority certifies that the constructing authority has matching  funds
available for  the same or similar purposes as the Article XI-G bonds that will fund the grant
to the constructing authority, that the matching funds  are not proceeds of indebtedness in-
curred by the state under any other article  of the Oregon Constitution, and that the
matching funds are available to the constructing authority  in an amount at least equal to
the amount of indebtedness incurred  by the state through the issuance of the Article XI-G
bonds.
SECTION 7. (1) Out of the amount  specified in section 1 (6)(m)(A) of this 2021 Act, the
State Treasurer may  issue Article XI-Q bonds in an amount not to exceed $20,383,129 of net
proceeds for the purposes and in the manner  specified in section 8, chapter 705, Oregon Laws
2013, plus an amount estimated by the State Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related costs.
(2) Out of the amount specified in section 1 (6)(m)(B) of this  2021 Act, the State Treas-
urer may issue Article XI-Q bonds in an amount not to  exceed $94,500,000 of net proceeds for
the purposes and in the manner specified in  section 8, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, plus
an amount estimated by the State Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related costs.
(3) Out of the amount specified in section 1 (6)(m)(C)  of this 2021 Act, the State Treas-
urer may issue Article XI-Q bonds in an amount not to  exceed $11,700,000 of net proceeds for
the purposes and in the manner specified in  section 8, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, plus
an amount estimated by the State Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related costs.
(4) Out of the amount specified in section 1 (6)(m)(D) of this 2021  Act, the State Treas-
urer may issue Article XI-Q bonds in an amount not to  exceed $15,900,000 of net proceeds for
the purposes and in the manner specified in  section 8, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, plus
an amount estimated by the State Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related costs.
(5) For purposes of sections 8 and 9, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, and section  64,
chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013,  bonds issued pursuant to this section are considered to be
bonds issued pursuant to section 8, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013.
(6) Bonds may not be issued pursuant to section 1 (6)(m)(A), (B), (C) or (D) of this 2021
Act except as provided in this section.
SECTION 8. From the  net proceeds of bonds issued under section 1 (6)(b)(C) of this 2021
Act, the Office of Emergency Management may expend a maximum of $2,000,000 for  urban
search and rescue preparedness equipment.
SECTION 9. A community college for which a project to be funded with general obligation
bonds authorized to be issued under Article XI-G of the Oregon Constitution is  approved in
this 2021 Act may not request approval for an additional project to be funded with general
obligation bonds authorized to be issued under Article  XI-G of the Oregon Constitution until
the beginning of the  regular session of the Legislative assembly held in 2025, unless the
community college withdraws the project approved under this 2021 Act.
SECTION 10. (1) A public university that is carrying out a qualified project shall require
each contractor in a contract with an estimated cost of $200,000 or greater to:
(a) Employ apprentices to perform 15  percent of the work hours that workers in
apprenticeable occupations perform under  the contract, in a manner consistent with the
apprentices’ respective apprenticeship training programs;
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 7
(b) Establish and  execute a plan for outreach, recruitment and retention of women, mi-
nority individuals and veterans to perform work under the contract, with the aspirational
target of having at least 15 percent of total  work hours performed by individuals in one or
more of those groups;
(c) Provide health insurance and retirement benefits to workers; and
(d) Require any subcontractor engaged by  the contractor to abide by the requirements
set forth in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this subsection, if the work  to be performed under
the subcontract has an estimated cost of $200,000 or greater.
(2) On or before February 1 of each year, each public university that is carrying out  a
qualified project shall  report to the Joint Committee on Ways and Means or Joint Interim
Committee on Ways and Means, as part of the report required under ORS 350.379, on:
(a) The amount of work performed on qualified projects by apprentices;
(b) The amount of work performed on qualified projects by women,  minority individuals
and veterans; and
(c) The types and  costs of health insurance and retirement benefits provided to workers
by contractors and subcontractors.
(3) The requirements of this section are in addition to, and  not in lieu of, the require-
ments imposed under ORS 350.379.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Apprentice” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(b) “Apprenticeable occupation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(c) “Apprenticeship training program”  means the total system of apprenticeship that a
particular local joint committee, as defined in ORS 660.010, operates, including the local joint
committee’s registered standards  and all other terms and conditions for qualifying, recruit-
ing, selecting, employing and training apprentices in an apprenticeable occupation.
(d) “Minority individual” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
(e) “Qualified project” means the following capital construction projects:
(A) The Eastern Oregon University Inlow Hall Renovation, Phase II  referenced in section
1 (1)(a) of this 2021 Act;
(B) The Oregon State University Cascades  Student Success Center referenced in section
1 (1)(b)(A) of this 2021 Act;
(C) The Oregon State University Cordley Hall Renovation, Phase II referenced  in section
1 (1)(b)(B) of this 2021 Act;
(D) The Portland State University  Gateway Center Reuse and Extension referenced in
section 1 (1)(c) of this 2021 Act;
(E) The University of Oregon Heritage Building Renovation referenced in section 1  (1)(d)
of this 2021 Act; and
(F) The Western Oregon University Student Success Center referenced in section 1 (1)(e)
of this 2021 Act.
(f) “Veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225.
(g) “Woman” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
SECTION 11.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 8
Passed by Senate June 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 9